Hawaii statutes.
[§414D-36] Bylaws. (a) The
incorporators or board of directors of a corporation shall adopt initial bylaws
for the corporation.

(b) The bylaws may contain any provision for
regulating and managing the affairs of the corporation that is not inconsistent
with law or the articles of incorporation. [L 2001, c 105, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next